Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-306
Wife's right to defend.

If a husband and wife be sued together, the wife may defend for her own right; and if the husband neglect to defend, she may defend for his right also.

R.S.1867, Code § 35, p. 398;

R.S.1913, § 7587;

C.S.1922, § 8530;

C.S.1929, § 20-306;

R.S.1943, § 25-306.